Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-229.01
State trust company; merger or consolidation with state bank; procedure.

Any state trust company, with the approval of the Department of Banking and Finance, may, upon a vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of its capital stock, merge or consolidate with any state bank which has obtained powers to conduct a trust business pursuant to the Nebraska Trust Company Act. The merging trust company must file with the department a certificate of the stockholders of the trust company that the resolution to merge or consolidate has been duly adopted by the holders of at least two-thirds of the capital stock of the trust company.

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 46;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 50.